Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 1 Causes of Action

9-1-1.
Action on promissory note.

Whenever any persons or bodies corporate, by themselves or by any person by them lawfully authorized for the purpose, shall make or sign any promissory note whereby the persons or bodies corporate shall promise to pay to any other person or body corporate any sum of money or specific article mentioned in the note, the sum or article shall be taken and construed to be, by virtue thereof, due and payable to the person or body corporate; and the person or body corporate may maintain an action for the sum or article against the person or body corporate who shall have made the promissory note.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 166, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 201, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 457, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-1

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 12.

9-1-2.
Civil liability for crimes and offenses.

Whenever any person shall suffer any injury to his or her person, reputation, or estate by reason of the commission of any crime or offense, he or she may recover his or her damages for the injury in a civil action against the offender, and it shall not be any defense to such action that no criminal complaint for the crime or offense has been made; and whenever any person shall be guilty of larceny, he or she shall be liable to the owner of the money or articles taken for twice the value thereof, unless the money or articles are restored, and for the value thereof in case of restoration.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 236; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 478, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6.

Form of Action.

An action for money had and received will lie where one has obtained money from another by oppression, imposition, extortion or deceit, and the law implies the promise from such person to return it to the lawful owner. Williams v. Smith,

29 R.I. 562

, 72 A. 1093,

1909 R.I. LEXIS 55

(1909).

Where the action brought to recover double damages for embezzlement was begun by writ of summons and declaration and alleged that the defendant as plaintiff’s bookkeeper used plaintiff’s money for her own use, the action was in trespass, rather than assumpsit, so as to warrant a body execution. Da Costa v. Rose,

71 R.I. 124

, 42 A.2d 665,

1945 R.I. LEXIS 24

(1945).

Superior court had jurisdiction over a wrongful death complaint brought under the Slayer’s Act,

R.I. Gen. Laws

§

33-1.1-1(3)

, that sought civil liability for a criminal act under

R.I. Gen. Laws

§

9-1-2

; the complaint essentially sought a declaration under the Uniform Declaratory Judgment Act, R.I. Gen. Laws §

9-30-1

et seq., that the husband was a slayer of the decedent. Once a declaration was made, a probate court could determine what effect that declaration had on asset distribution. Tyre v. Swain, 946 A.2d 1189,

2008 R.I. LEXIS 57

(R.I. 2008).

9-1-2.1.
Civil liability for stalking.

Any person who suffers harm pursuant to chapter 59 of title 11 may recover his or her damages in a civil action against the offender.

As used in this section:

“Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a period of time, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

“Harasses” means following a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person which seriously alarms, annoys, or bothers the person, and which serves no legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be of a kind that would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, or be in fear of bodily injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 279, § 1.

9-1-3.
Liability of parents for torts of minors.

The parent or parents of any unemancipated minor or minors, which minor or minors willfully or maliciously cause damage to any property or injury to any person, shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor or minors for the damage or injury to an amount not exceeding fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) if the minor or minors would have been liable for the damage or injury if they had been adults; provided, nothing herein shall be construed to relieve the minor or minors from personal liability for the damage or injury. The liability herein provided for shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other liability which may exist at law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3749, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-3

; P.L. 1974, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 296, § 1.

9-1-3.1.
Liability of parents and unemancipated minors for torts to each other.

A parent may be held liable for injuries caused to his or her unemancipated minor child by the parent’s negligent acts or omissions. In all cases in which the injured minor is living, prior to the commencement of any civil action hereunder, a petition shall be brought in the superior court in the county in which the injured minor resides for the appointment of a guardian ad litem to pursue the action on behalf of the minor. The guardian ad litem shall not be a member of the minor’s family. Once appointed, the guardian ad litem shall be empowered to make all decisions on behalf of the minor relating to the cause of action against the parent. If the minor is deceased, the civil action may be commenced by his or her executor or administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 438, § 1.

9-1-4.
Statute of frauds.

No action shall be brought:

Whereby to charge any person upon any contract for the sale of lands, tenements, or hereditaments, or the making of any lease thereof for a longer time than one year;

Whereby to charge any person upon any agreement made upon consideration of marriage;

Whereby to charge any trustee under any express trust, or any executor or administrator, upon his or her special promise to answer any debt or damage out of his or her own estate;

Whereby to charge any person upon his or her special promise to answer for the debt, default, or miscarriage of another person;

Whereby to charge any person upon any agreement which is not to be performed within the space of one year from the making thereof;

Whereby to charge any person upon any agreement or promise to pay any commission for or upon the sale of any interest in real estate;

Except in cases to which the Uniform Commercial Code (title 6A) applies, whereby to charge any person upon any contract for the sale of personal property beyond five thousand dollars ($5,000) in an amount or value of remedy, unless the promise or agreement upon which the action shall be brought, or some note or memorandum thereof, shall be in writing, and signed by the party to be charged therewith, or by some other person by him or her thereunto lawfully authorized.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 226; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 481, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 34, § 1.

9-1-5.
Liability of landlord for improvements to real estate by tenant by oral lease.

The owner of real estate who induces a tenant to occupy it by promising to give him or her a lease of the real estate, the term of which is more than one year, shall be liable, if he or she fails or refuses to fulfill his or her promise, for the cost to the tenant of all improvements, repairs, alterations, betterments, and equipment made to, or placed upon the occupied premises, in reliance upon the promise and with the approval of the owner; provided, however, that this section shall not apply in case of a definite letting where rent is reserved or paid, nor in case the unfulfilled promise of the owner is in writing and is itself legally enforceable, nor in case of original or continued occupancy of the premises under a written instrument, signed by the parties. Such costs shall be recoverable by the tenant, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors, and assigns, in a civil action for money had and received, brought against the owner, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns, commenced within one year after the termination of the original tenancy, and not thereafter. Neither the tender of the promised lease after termination of, or notice of intention to terminate, the original tenancy, nor delay during occupancy to begin suit, shall prejudice or defeat the action.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 296, § 25, as enacted by P.L. 1932, ch. 1960, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 481, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-5

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6.

9-1-6.
Causes and actions surviving death of parties.

In addition to the causes of action and actions which at common law survive the death of the plaintiff or defendant therein, the following causes of action or actions shall also survive:

Causes of action and actions of waste.

Causes of action and actions of replevin and for conversion.

Causes of action and actions for damages to the person or to real and personal estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 227; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 512, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-6

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6.

9-1-7.
Prosecution and defense of actions by executor or administrator.

All the causes of action and actions as provided in §

9-1-6

may be originally brought and prosecuted by and against executors and administrators; and if brought or prosecuted by or against any person in his or her lifetime, the action may be prosecuted or defended by his or her executor or administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 228; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 512, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-7

.

9-1-8.
Actual damages only to be granted after death of party.

Whenever any of the causes of action or actions as provided in §

9-1-6

are, originally or by survival, brought or prosecuted by or against the executor or administrator of the party originally liable, the plaintiff shall be entitled to recover only the value of the goods taken, or the damage actually sustained, without any vindictive or exemplary damages, or damages for any alleged outrage to the feelings of the injured party.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 229; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 512, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-8

.

9-1-9.
Survival of actions for the recovery of possession of land.

Civil actions to recover possession of land shall survive the death of the plaintiff or defendant and may be prosecuted or defended by the heir, devisee, executor, or administrator of the deceased party, as the right may descend or vest.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 230; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 512, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-9

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6.

9-1-10.
Settlement of real estate title in action involving executor or administrator.

In no case shall the title to real estate be settled or affected, except so far as relates to the case on trial, if and so far as the case on trial shall be prosecuted or defended by an executor or administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 231; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 512, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-10

.

9-1-11.
Survival of claims for damages in laying out of highways.

Claims for damages on account of the laying out of highways through lands of the claimants, and appeals from proceedings in laying out highways, shall survive the death of the claimant and appellant; and the executors, administrators, heirs, and devisees of the claimant or appellant may, jointly or severally, according to their interest, prosecute the claim or appeal in any stage of the proceedings. In case of an appeal by the executors, administrators, heirs, or devisees, the proceedings shall be taken in the manner prescribed in chapter 23 of title 33; but the appeal shall be claimed within eighty (80) days after the determination appealed from, and all other periods, except as to notice mentioned in that chapter, shall be increased by forty (40) days.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 232; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 512, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-11

.

9-1-12.
When action is commenced for purposes of statute of limitations.

An action is commenced for purposes of the statute of limitations when the complaint is either filed with the court, deposited in the mail addressed to the clerk, or delivered to an officer for service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 4.

9-1-13.
Limitation of actions generally — Product liability.

Except as otherwise specially provided, all civil actions shall be commenced within ten (10) years next after the cause of action shall accrue, and not after.

[Ruled unconstitutional, see case notes] Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an action for the recovery of damages for personal injury, death, or damage to real or personal property, including any action based upon implied warranties arising out of an alleged design, inspection, listing, or manufacturing defect, or any other alleged defect of whatsoever kind or nature in a product, or arising out of any alleged failure to warn regarding a product, or arising out of any alleged failure to properly instruct in the use of a product, shall be commenced within ten (10) years after the date the product was first purchased for use or consumption.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6; P.L. 1978, ch. 299, § 2.

Parties Entitled to Assert Statute.

An action by a lender against a borrower and his accountant for fraud in an accounting statement prepared by the accountant and supplied by the borrower to the lender in order to obtain a loan is governed by this section. Rusch Factors, Inc. v. Levin, 284 F. Supp. 85, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7731 (D.R.I. 1968).

When, acting in behalf of the state, the attorney-general deems it his duty to prosecute for a forfeiture, it is not for the court, in the absence of any statutory limitations, to say he is too late. State v. Pawtuxet Turnpike Corp.,

8 R.I. 521

,

1867 R.I. LEXIS 12

(1867).

Creditor of an insolvent decedent’s estate could interpose the statute of limitations to the allowance of a claim, such defense being one which the executor or administrator could interpose. Mason v. Taft,

23 R.I. 388

, 50 A. 648,

1901 R.I. LEXIS 154

(1901).

9-1-14.
Limitation of actions for words spoken or personal injuries.

Actions for words spoken shall be commenced and sued within one year next after the words spoken, and not after.

Actions for injuries to the person shall be commenced and sued within three (3) years next after the cause of action shall accrue, and not after, except as provided for otherwise in subsection (c) herein. Notwithstanding anything herein, any claim based on sexual abuse or exploitation of a child shall be governed by §

9-1-51

.

As to an action for personal injuries wherein an injured party is entitled to proceed against an insurer pursuant to §

27-7-2

, where an action is otherwise properly filed against an insured within the time limitations provided for by this section, and process against the insured tortfeasor has been returned “non estinventus” and filed with the court, then the statutory limitation for filing an action under §

27-7-2

directly against an insurer shall be extended an additional one hundred twenty (120) days after the expiration of the time limitation provided for in subsection (b) herein.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 248; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-14

; P.L. 1971, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 83, § 1.

9-1-14.1.
Limitation on malpractice actions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

9-1-13

and

9-1-14

, an action for medical, veterinarian, accounting, or insurance or real estate agent or broker malpractice shall be commenced within three (3) years from the time of the occurrence of the incident that gave rise to the action; provided, however, that:

One who is under disability by reason of age and on whose behalf no action is brought within the period of three (3) years from the time of the occurrence of the incident shall bring the action at any time up to twenty-one (21) years of age.

One who is under disability by reason of mental incompetence, or otherwise, and on whose behalf no action is brought within the period of three (3) years from the time of the occurrence of the incident, shall bring the action within three (3) years from the removal of the disability.

In respect to those injuries or damages due to acts of medical, veterinarian, accounting, or insurance or real estate agent or broker malpractice that could not in the exercise of reasonable diligence be discoverable at the time of the occurrence of the incident that gave rise to the action, suit shall be commenced within three (3) years of the time that the act or acts of the malpractice should, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, have been discovered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 244, § 8; P.L. 1981, ch. 101, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 273, § 1.

9-1-14.2.
Limitation of “Agent Orange” or phenoxy herbicides actions.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an action to recover damages for personal injury caused by contact with or exposure to phenoxy herbicides while serving as a member of the armed forces of the United States in Indo-China from January 1, 1962, through March 29, 1973, may be commenced within three (3) years from the date of the discovery of the injury, or within three (3) years from the date when through the exercise of reasonable diligence the cause of the injury should have been discovered, whichever is later.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 235, § 1.

9-1-14.3.
Limitation on legal malpractice actions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

9-1-13

and

9-1-14

, an action for legal malpractice shall be commenced within three (3) years of the occurrence of the incident which gave rise to the action; provided, however, that:

One who is under disability by reason of age, mental incompetence, or otherwise, and on whose behalf no action is brought within the period of three (3) years from the time of the occurrence of the incident, shall bring the action within three (3) years from the removal of the disability.

In respect to those injuries due to acts of legal malpractice which could not in the exercise of reasonable diligence be discoverable at the time of the occurrence of the incident which gave rise to the action, suit shall be commenced within three (3) years of the time that the act or acts of legal malpractice should, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, have been discovered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 212, § 1.

9-1-14.4.
Limitations on home inspector malpractice actions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

9-1-13

and

9-1-14

, an action against a licensed home inspector for injury or damage arising out of a home inspection shall be commenced within three (3) years of delivery to the client of the written home inspection report giving rise to the action; provided, however, that:

One who is under disability by reason of age, mental incompetence, or otherwise, and on whose behalf no action is brought within the period of three (3) years from the foregoing date of delivery, shall bring the action within three (3) years from the removal of the disability;

In respect to those injuries or damages arising out of a home inspection which could not in the exercise of reasonable diligence be discovered at the time of delivery of the inspection report, suit shall be commenced within three (3) years of the time that the injuries or damages arising out of the home inspection should, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, have been discovered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 140, § 3.

9-1-15, 9-1-16.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 249, 250; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1956, §§

9-1-15

, 9-1-16; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 7, effective January 10, 1966.

9-1-17.
Limitation of actions on contracts or liabilities under seal and on judgments.

The following actions shall be commenced and sued within twenty (20) years next after the cause of action shall accrue and not after: actions on contracts or liabilities under seal; and actions on judgments or decrees of any court of record of the United States, or of any state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 251; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-17

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6.

Partial Payments.

Action of debt on a judgment commenced more than 20 years after its rendition was barred by this section, even though judgment debtor, within the 20-year period, made several part payments on account of such judgment. Garabedian v. Avedisian,

42 R.I. 78

, 105 A. 516,

1919 R.I. LEXIS 8

(1919).

9-1-18.
Effect of absence from state on limitations.

If any person against whom there is or shall be cause for any action, as enumerated in this chapter, in favor of a resident of the state, shall at the time the cause accrues be outside the limits of the state, or being within the state at the time the cause accrues shall go out of the state before the action is barred by the provisions of this chapter, and does not have or leave property or estate in the state that can be attached by process of law, then the person entitled to the action may commence the action, within the time before limited, after the person has returned into the state in such a manner that an action may, with reasonable diligence, be commenced against him or her by the person entitled to the action; provided, however, that no action shall be brought by any person upon a cause of action accruing outside this state which was barred by limitation or otherwise in the state, territory, or country in which the cause of action arose while he or she resided in the state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 252; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 5; P.L. 1909, ch. 457, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-18

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 13.

9-1-19.
Disability postponing running of statute.

If any person at the time any such cause of action shall accrue to him or her shall be under the age of eighteen (18) years, or of unsound mind, or beyond the limits of the United States, the person may bring the cause of action, within the time limited under this chapter, after the impediment is removed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 253; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-19

; P.L. 1988, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 407, § 1.

9-1-20.
Time of accrual of concealed cause of action.

If any person, liable to an action by another, shall fraudulently, by actual misrepresentation, conceal from him or her the existence of the cause of action, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue against the person so liable at the time when the person entitled to sue thereon shall first discover its existence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 254; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-20

.

9-1-21.
Effect of death of party on statute of limitations.

If any person, for or against whom any causes of action enumerated in this chapter accrue, dies before the time limited for bringing action, or within sixty (60) days after the expiration of that time, and the cause of action survives, the action may be commenced by or against the executor or administrator of the deceased person, as the case may be, at any time not more than one year after the appointment of the executor or administrator of the person so dying, and not afterwards, if barred by the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, that any such action shall be brought within three (3) years after the death of the person and not after.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 255; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-21

; P.L. 1984, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 14.

9-1-22.
Extension of time after termination of action.

If an action is timely commenced and is terminated in any other manner than by a voluntary discontinuance, a dismissal of the complaint for neglect to prosecute the action, or a final judgment upon the merits, the plaintiff, or if he or she dies and the claim survives, his or her executor or administrator, may commence a new action upon the same claim within one year after the termination.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 256; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 9; P.L. 1911, ch. 684, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-22

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6.

Parties to Action.

This section is not applicable in the case of a defendant who was a stranger to the original action. Luft v. Factory Mut. Liability Ins. Co.,

51 R.I. 452

, 155 A. 526,

1931 R.I. LEXIS 73

(1931), overruled in part, Frazier v. Liberty Mut. Ins. Co., 229 A.3d 56,

2020 R.I. LEXIS 44

(R.I. 2020).

Superior court erred in holding that the statute of limitations barred a customer’s claim for personal injuries that arose from a fall on an insured’s property, where the customer’s first suit against the insured was dismissed and then the customer substituted the insurer under §

27-7-2

in the second suit. The savings statute, §

9-1-22

, was applicable since the insurer and the insured in this case shared a sufficient commonality of interest to consider them sufficiently linked under the savings statute; and the insurer was aware of the lawsuit, as it had dispatched lawyers to ask the court to dismiss the first action on grounds of inadequate service of process on its insured. Frazier v. Liberty Mut. Ins. Co., 229 A.3d 56,

2020 R.I. LEXIS 44

(R.I. 2020).

Luft v. Factory Mut. Liability Co.,

51 R.I. 452

, 155 A. 526 (1931), is overruled to the extent it is inconsistent with this opinion. Frazier v. Liberty Mut. Ins. Co., 229 A.3d 56,

2020 R.I. LEXIS 44

(R.I. 2020).

9-1-23.
Effect of joinder of counts on limitation.

Whenever counts are joined in the same complaint, the limitations of time for commencing suit applicable to the cause of action set out in any count shall be the same as if the action was brought on the count only, and the limitation may be pleaded to that count instead of to the entire action.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 257; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-23

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 6.

9-1-24.
Special limitations provisions unaffected.

The provisions of §§

9-1-14

—

9-1-23

shall not apply to any case in which a different time is limited by special provisions.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 257; G.L. 1909, ch. 284, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 334, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 510, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-1-24

.

9-1-25.
Time for bringing suit against state, political subdivision, city, or town.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and in §

9-1-51

, for cases of sexual abuse, when a claimant is given the right to sue the state of Rhode Island, any political subdivision of the state, or any city or town by a special act of the general assembly, or in cases involving actions or claims in tort against the state or any political subdivision thereof or any city or town, the action shall be instituted within three (3) years from the effective date of the special act, or within three (3) years of the accrual of any claim of tort. Failure to institute suit within the three-year (3) period shall constitute a bar to the bringing of the legal action.

In cases of childhood sexual abuse, the time for bringing suit against the state of Rhode Island or any other entity identified in subsection (a) of this section, §

9-1-51

shall apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 83, § 1.

9-1-26.
Liability of hospitals.

Every hospital operating within this state, whether sustained in whole or in part by charitable contributions or endowments, shall be liable for the neglect, carelessness, or want of skill or for malicious act of any of its officers, agents, or employees in the management of or for the care or treatment of any of the patients or inmates of the hospital in the same manner as any other person or corporation would be liable at common law for similar acts on the part of his or her or its officers, agents, or employees. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to impair any remedy under existing laws which any person may have against any officer, agent, or employee of any hospital for any act or omission in the course of his or her conduct or employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 43, § 2.

9-1-27.
Police and firefighters — Immunity from liability.

No member of any police force or fire department of the state or any city or town, investigators of the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

, inspectors and agents of the Rhode Island state fugitive task force appointed pursuant to §

12-6-7.2

, or any person acting in the capacity of a rescue attendant or member of a rescue squad, and no officer or member in active service in any incorporated protective department cooperating with fire departments, and no person performing the duties of a firefighter in a town or city, and no member of any volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue squad or member of any voluntary ambulance association, whether the company or squad is incorporated or not, who while on duty and in the performance of that duty voluntarily and gratuitously renders emergency assistance to a person in need thereof, and no person properly certified by the American heart association or the American national red cross in basic or advanced life support as defined in the standards of the American heart association or the American national red cross who voluntarily and gratuitously renders emergency assistance to a person in need thereof shall be liable for civil damages for any personal injuries or property damage which result from acts or omissions by the persons rendering the emergency care, which may constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross, willful, or wanton negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 577, § 1.

9-1-27.1.
Good Samaritan — Immunity from liability.

No person who voluntarily and gratuitously renders emergency assistance to a person in need thereof including the administration of life saving treatment to those persons suffering from anaphylactic shock shall be liable for civil damages which result from acts or omissions by such persons rendering the emergency care, which may constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton conduct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 160, § 1.

9-1-27.2.
Court appointed special advocate program — Immunity from liability.

The state shall protect and hold harmless any attorney, director, coordinator, or social worker employed in the court appointed special advocate program and its court appointed volunteer special advocates (C.A.S.A.) from financial loss and expense, including legal fees and costs, if any, arising out of any claim, demand, or suit for damages resulting from acts or omissions committed in the discharge of his or her duties with the program and within the scope of his or her employment which may constitute negligence, but which acts are not wanton, malicious, or grossly negligent as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 102, § 1.

9-1-27.3.
Court appointed law clerk advocate program — Immunity from liability.

The state shall protect and hold harmless any law clerk employed by the supreme court participating in the court appointed law clerk advocate program from financial loss and expenses, including legal fees and costs, if any, arising out of any claim, demand, or suit for damages resulting from acts or omissions committed in the discharge of his or her duties with the program which may constitute negligence, but which acts are not wanton, malicious, or grossly negligent as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction. The supreme court shall, by order, promulgate rules governing the court appointed law clerk advocate program, defining the types of cases and proceedings in which the law clerks, who have passed the Rhode Island bar, may participate as advocates under that program, and providing for appropriate general supervision of the law clerk advocates within that program by experienced members of the bar of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 360, § 1.

9-1-28.
Action for unauthorized use of name, portrait, or picture.

Any person whose name, portrait, or picture is used within the state for commercial purposes without his or her written consent may bring an action in the superior court against the person so using his or her name, portrait, or picture to prevent and restrain the use thereof, and may recover damages for any injuries sustained by reason of such use. If the defendant shall have knowingly used the person’s name, portrait, or picture in such manner as is prohibited or unlawful, the court, in its discretion, may award the plaintiff treble the amount of the damages sustained by him or her.

Nothing in this section shall be so construed as to:

Apply to the use of names, portraits, or pictures in political speech or on matters of public concern;

Prevent any person practicing the profession of photography from exhibiting in or about his or her or its establishment specimens of the work of the person or establishment, unless the exhibiting of any such specimen is continued after written notice objecting to it has been given by the person portrayed; or

Prevent any person from using the name, portrait, or picture of any manufacturer or dealer in connection with the goods, wares, and merchandise manufactured, produced, or dealt in by the manufacturer or dealer which the person has sold or disposed of with the name, portrait, or picture used in connection therewith, or from using the name, portrait, or picture of any author, composer, or artist in connection with any literary, musical, or artistic production of the author, composer, or artist which the person has sold or disposed of with the name, portrait, or picture used in connection therewith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 384, § 1.

9-1-28.1.
Right to privacy — Action for deprivation of right.

Right to privacy created. It is the policy of this state that every person in this state shall have a right to privacy which shall be defined to include any of the following rights individually:

The right to be secure from unreasonable intrusion upon one’s physical solitude or seclusion;

In order to recover for violation of this right, it must be established that:

It was an invasion of something that is entitled to be private or would be expected to be private;

The invasion was or is offensive or objectionable to a reasonable man; although,

The person who discloses the information need not benefit from the disclosure.

The right to be secure from an appropriation of one’s name or likeness;

In order to recover for violation of this right, it must be established that:

The act was done without permission of the claimant;

The act is of a benefit to someone other than the claimant;

It need not be established that there was any publication.

The right to be secure from unreasonable publicity given to one’s private life;

In order to recover for violation of this right, it must be established that:

There has been some publication of a private fact;

The fact which has been made public must be one which would be offensive or objectionable to a reasonable man of ordinary sensibilities;

The fact which has been disclosed need not be of any benefit to the discloser of the fact.

The right to be secure from publicity that reasonably places another in a false light before the public;

In order to recover for violation of this right, it must be established that:

There has been some publication of a false or fictitious fact which implies an association which does not exist;

The association which has been published or implied would be objectionable to the ordinary reasonable man under the circumstances;

The fact which was disclosed need not be of any benefit to the discloser.

Right of action. Every person who subjects or causes to be subjected any citizen of this state or other person within the jurisdiction thereof to a deprivation and/or violation of his or her right to privacy shall be liable to the party injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or any other appropriate proceedings for redress in either the superior court or district court of this state. The court having jurisdiction of an action brought pursuant to this section may award reasonable attorneys’ fees and court costs to the prevailing party.

Right of access. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or abridge any existing right of access at law or in equity of any party to the records kept by any agency of state or municipal government.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 403, § 1.

9-1-29.
Constructors of improvements to real property — Immunity from liability.

No action (including arbitration proceedings) in tort to recover damages shall be brought against any architect or professional engineer who designed, planned, or supervised to any extent the construction of improvements to real property, or against any contractor or subcontractor who constructed the improvements to real property, or material suppliers who furnished materials for the construction of the improvements, on account of any deficiency in the design, planning, supervision, or observation of construction or construction of any such improvements or in the materials furnished for the improvements:

For injury to property, real or personal, arising out of any such deficiency;

For injury to the person or for wrongful death arising out of any such deficiency; or

For contribution or indemnity for damages sustained on account of any injury mentioned in subdivisions (1) and (2) hereof more than ten (10) years after substantial completion of such an improvement; provided, however, that this shall not be construed to extend the time in which actions may otherwise be brought under §§

9-1-13

and

9-1-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 119, § 1.